Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.430

Consolidation of local governmental unit and first-class city retirement system—Compliance with laws and rules—Application of sections.

(1) Consolidated employers that employ persons governed by RCW 41.04.410, 41.04.415, or 41.04.420 shall comply with all laws and rules governing the retirement system in which the persons participate as members, including but not limited to the obligations to make employer contributions, to deduct and transmit employee contributions, and to submit required reports.

(2) RCW 41.04.410, 41.04.415, 41.04.420, and 41.04.425 govern any consolidation occurring on or after December 31, 1981.

[ 1984 c 184 s 28.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.